Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-419.01
Legislative Fiscal Analyst; present evaluation of state operations; when.

The Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall present to the Appropriations Committee, beginning the fifth legislative day, an evaluation of the operations of the state government including those issues, policies, and problems which have come to his or her attention or which resulted from analyses and in which improvement in performance and organization is possible. The Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall, if requested, recommend alternatives to the identified problems and related needs.

Laws 1969, c. 429, § 3, p. 1451;

Laws 1973, LB 291, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 996, § 5.